North Carolina statutes. Chapter 42A. Vacation Rental Act.
Article 5. Landlord and Tenant Duties.

§ 42A-31.
Landlord to provide fit premises.

A landlord of a residential property used for a vacation rental shall:

Comply with all current applicable building and housing codes to the extent required by the operation of the codes. However, no new requirement is imposed if a structure is exempt from a current building or housing code.

Make all repairs and do whatever is reasonably necessary to put and keep the property in a fit and habitable condition.

Keep all common areas of the property in safe condition.

Maintain in good and safe working order and reasonably and promptly repair all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, and other facilities and major appliances supplied by him or her upon written notification from the tenant that repairs are needed.

Provide operable smoke detectors. The landlord shall replace or repair the smoke detectors if the landlord is notified by the tenant in writing that replacement or repair is needed. The landlord shall annually place new batteries in a battery-operated smoke detector, and the tenant shall replace the batteries as needed during the tenancy. Failure of the tenant to replace the batteries as needed shall not be considered negligence on the part of the tenant or landlord.

Provide a minimum of one operable carbon monoxide alarm per rental unit per level, either battery-operated or electrical, that is listed by a nationally recognized testing laboratory that is OSHA-approved to test and certify to American National Standards Institute/Underwriters Laboratories Standards ANSI/UL2034 or ANSI/UL2075, and install the carbon monoxide alarms in accordance with either the standards of the National Fire Protection Association or the minimum protection designated in the manufacturer’s instructions, which the landlord shall retain or provide as proof of compliance. A landlord that installs one carbon monoxide alarm per rental unit per level shall be deemed to be in compliance with standards under this subdivision covering the location and number of alarms. The landlord shall replace or repair the carbon monoxide alarms within three days of receipt of notification if the landlord is notified of needed replacement or repairs in writing by the tenant. At least every six months, the landlord shall ensure that a carbon monoxide alarm is operable and in good repair. Unless the landlord and the tenant have a written agreement to the contrary, the landlord shall place new batteries in a battery-operated carbon monoxide alarm annually and the tenant shall replace the batteries as needed during the tenancy. Failure of the tenant to replace the batteries as needed shall not be considered as negligence on the part of the tenant or the landlord. A carbon monoxide alarm may be combined with smoke alarms if the combined alarm does both of the following: (i) complies with ANSI/UL2034 or ANSI/UL2075 for carbon monoxide alarms and ANSI/UL217 for smoke alarms and (ii) emits an alarm in a manner that clearly differentiates between detecting the presence of carbon monoxide and the presence of smoke. This subdivision applies only to dwelling units having a fossil-fuel burning heater, appliance, or fireplace and in any dwelling unit having an attached garage. Any operable carbon monoxide detector installed before January 1, 2015, shall be deemed to be in compliance with this subdivision.

These duties shall not be waived; however, the landlord and tenant may make additional covenants not inconsistent herewith in the vacation rental agreement.

History.

1999-420, s. 1; 2016-98, s. 1.3.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-98, s. 1.9, provides: “This Part becomes effective July 1, 2016. Nothing in this Part shall be construed as being applicable to or affecting any litigation pending on that date.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-98, s. 1.3, in subdivision (1), inserted “to the extent required by the operation of the codes.” in the first sentence and added the second sentence; and added subdivision (6). See editor’s note for effective date and applicability.

Legal Periodicals.

For essay, “Confusion Worse Confounded:
The North Carolina Residential Rental Agreements Act,” see 78 N.C.L. Rev. 539 (2000).

§ 42A-32.
Tenant to maintain dwelling unit.

The tenant of a residential property used for a vacation rental shall:

Keep that part of the property which he or she occupies and uses as clean and safe as the conditions of the property permit and cause no unsafe or unsanitary conditions in the common areas and remainder of the property that he or she uses.

Dispose of all ashes, rubbish, garbage, and other waste in a clean and safe manner.

Keep all plumbing fixtures in the property or used by the tenant as clean as their condition permits.

Not deliberately or negligently destroy, deface, damage, or remove any part of the property or render inoperable the smoke detector provided by the landlord or knowingly permit any person to do so.

Comply with all obligations imposed upon the tenant by current applicable building and housing codes.

Be responsible for all damage, defacement, or removal of any property inside the property that is in his or her exclusive control unless the damage, defacement, or removal was due to ordinary wear and tear, acts of the landlord or his or her agent, defective products supplied or repairs authorized by the landlord, acts of third parties not invitees of the tenant, or natural forces.

Notify the landlord of the need for replacement of or repairs to a smoke detector. The landlord shall annually place new batteries in a battery-operated smoke detector, and the tenant shall replace the batteries as needed during the tenancy. Failure of the tenant to replace the batteries as needed shall not be considered negligence on the part of the tenant or the landlord.

These duties shall not be waived; however, the landlord and tenant may make additional covenants not inconsistent herewith in the vacation rental agreement.

History.

1999-420, s. 1.

§ 42A-33.
Responsibilities and liability of real estate broker.

A real estate broker managing a vacation rental property on behalf of a landlord shall do all of the following:

Manage the property in accordance with the terms of the written agency agreement signed by the landlord and real estate broker.

Offer vacation rental property to the public for leasing in compliance with all applicable federal and State laws, regulations, and ethical duties, including, but not limited to, those prohibiting discrimination on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, handicapping condition, or familial status.

Notify the landlord regarding any necessary repairs to keep the property in a fit and habitable or safe condition and follow the landlord’s direction in arranging for any such necessary repairs, including repairs to all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating, and other facilities and major appliances supplied by the landlord upon written notification from the tenant that repairs are needed.

Verify that the landlord has installed operable smoke detectors and carbon monoxide alarms.

Verify that the landlord has annually placed new batteries in a battery-operated smoke detector or carbon monoxide alarm. Failure of the tenant to replace the batteries as needed shall not be considered negligence on the part of the real estate broker.

A real estate broker or firm managing a vacation rental property on behalf of a landlord client shall not become personally liable as a party in any civil action between the landlord and tenant solely because the real estate broker or firm fails to identify the landlord of the property in the vacation rental agreement.

History.

2016-98, s. 1.3.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 2016-98, s. 1.9, made this section effective July 1, 2016, and further provides that “Nothing in this Part [Part I of Session Laws 2016-98] shall be construed as being applicable to or affecting any litigation pending on that date.”

§§ 42A-34 through 42A-35.

Reserved for future codification purposes.